Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.080

Noncertified tribes—Fugitive transport. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

(1) A noncertified tribe that requests extradition pursuant to chapter 207, Laws of 2024 is responsible to arrange the transportation for the tribal fugitive from the place of detention to the tribal court or detention facility. The detention facility and noncertified tribe are encouraged to select the means of transport that best protects public safety after considering available resources. At the request of a noncertified tribe, a city, county, or the governor must engage in good faith efforts to negotiate an agreement to effectuate this subsection.

(2) A tribal court representative who is certified as a general authority Washington peace officer under chapter 10.92 RCW, or who is cross-deputized pursuant to chapter 10.93 RCW, may transport a tribal fugitive within the state of Washington pursuant to an order of surrender.

[ 2024 c 207 s 9.]